District of Columbia statutes.
47-1817.08

Severability.

If any provision of this title relating to a Qualified High Technology Company is held to be invalid:

(1)

Any tax abatement, credit, or other benefit provided under this title shall not be increased, and the amount of tax imposed under this title shall not be decreased, as a result of such invalidity; and

(2)

A Qualified High Technology Company shall not pay additional taxes under this title to the District of Columbia until any proceedings to contest such taxes become final.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-256, § 408, 48 DCR 730
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see 2(b) of CareFirst Economic Assistance Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-246, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2759).
For temporary (90 day) addition of §§ 47-1850.01 to 47-1850.04, see § 2(e) of Homestead and Senior Citizen Real Property Tax Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-226, January 8, 2002, 49 DCR 668).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 47-1818.01, see § 2(b) of CareFirst Economic Assistance Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-460, July 26, 2002, 49 DCR 8175).